Massachusetts, session 194th, H3271.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 44b of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting in section 2 after 
“destruction” in the definition of “Preservation”, the following:- ; and digitization of documents 
considered historic resources which preserve the information content of the historic resource.